Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1105
Recognizance forfeited; recovery notwithstanding defects.

No action brought on any recognizance shall be barred or defeated, nor shall judgment thereon be reversed by reason of any neglect or omission to note or record the default, nor by reason of any defect in the form of the recognizance if it sufficiently appears from the tenor thereof at what court the party or witness was bound to appear and that the court or officer before whom it was taken was authorized by law to require and take such recognizance.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 388, p. 812;

R.S.1913, § 9019;

C.S.1922, § 10043;

R.S.1943, § 29-1105.

Lack of specific date for appearance in bail bond did not operate to relieve surety from liability. State v. Casey, 180 Neb. 888, 146 N.W.2d 370 (1966).